Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Partnerships
Reform Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12005 AQH 12/11/24






Req. No. 12005 Page 1